Utah statutes.
63C-7-302.   Bonds to be authorized by resolution -- Form -- Sale --
Negotiability -- Validity presumed.
(1)  Bonds of the Utah Communications Agency Network shall:
(a)  be authorized by resolution of the executive committee and may be issued
in one or more series;
(b)  bear dates, mature, bear interest rates, be in denominations, be either
coupon or registered, carry conversion or registration privileges, have rank
or priority, be executed, and be payable; and
(c)  be subject to terms of redemption, with or without premium, as the
resolution or its trust indenture provides.
(2)  The bonds may bear interest at a fixed or variable interest rate as the
resolution provides.  The resolution may establish a method, formula, or index
pursuant to which the interest rate on the bonds may be determined from time
to time.
(3)  In connection with the bonds, and on behalf of the Utah Communications
Agency Network, the executive committee may authorize and enter into
agreements or other arrangements with financial, banking, and other
institutions for letters of credit, standby letters of credit, surety bonds,
reimbursement agreements, remarketing agreements, indexing agreements, tender
agent agreements, and other agreements to secure the bonds, to enhance the
marketability and creditworthiness of the bonds, to determine a fixed or
variable interest rate on the bonds, and to pay from any legally available
source, including the proceeds of the bonds, of fees, charges, and other
amounts coming due with respect to any such agreements.
(4)  The bonds may be sold at public or private sale in a manner and at
prices, either at, in excess of, or below par value as provided by resolution
of the executive committee.
(5)  If members or officers of the Utah Communications Agency Network whose
signatures appear on bonds or coupons cease to be members or officers before
the delivery of the bonds, their signatures are valid and sufficient for all
purposes.
(6)  Any bonds issued under this part are fully negotiable.
(7)  In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or
enforceability of any bond of the Utah Communications Agency Network or the
security for it, any bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the
Utah Communications Agency Network to aid in financing the communications
network shall be conclusively considered to have been issued for such
purposes, and the communications network shall be conclusively considered to
have been planned, located, and carried out in accordance with this part.
